California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
 satisfied but not later than two years after the costs have been incurred, the judgment creditor claiming costs under this section shall file a memorandum of costs with the court clerk and serve a copy on the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail. The memorandum of costs shall be executed under oath by a person who has knowledge of the facts and shall state that to the person’s best knowledge and belief the costs are correct, are reasonable and necessary, and have not been satisfied.

(c) Within 10 days after the memorandum of costs is served on the judgment debtor, the judgment debtor may apply to the court on noticed motion to have the costs taxed by the court. The notice of motion shall be served on the judgment creditor. Service shall be made personally or by mail. The court shall make an order allowing
 or disallowing the costs to the extent justified under the circumstances of the case.

(d) If no motion to tax costs is made within the time provided in subdivision (c), the costs claimed in the memorandum are allowed.

(e) If a memorandum of costs for the costs specified in subdivision (a) is filed at the same time as an application for a writ of execution, these statutory costs not already allowed by the court in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) in the aggregate may be included in the amount specified in the writ of execution, subject to subsequent disallowance as ordered by the court pursuant to a motion to tax if filed by the debtor. The memorandum of costs shall contain the following statement: “The fees sought under this memorandum may be disallowed by a court
 upon a motion to tax filed by the debtor notwithstanding the fees having been included in the writ of execution.” The inclusion of the above costs in the writ of execution or the pendency of the motion to tax on these costs shall not be cause for the clerk of the court to delay issuing the writ of execution or for the levying officer to delay enforcing the writ of execution.

(f) Section 1013, extending the time within which a right may be exercised or an act may be done, applies to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 514, Sec. 2.   (AB 2837)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

685.080.

(a) The judgment creditor may claim costs authorized by Section 685.040 by noticed motion. The motion shall be made before the judgment is satisfied in full, but not later than two years after the costs have been incurred. The costs claimed under this section may include, but are not limited to, costs that may be claimed under Section 685.070 and costs incurred but not approved by the court or referee in a proceeding under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 708.010) of Division 2.

(b) The notice of motion shall describe the costs claimed, shall state their amount,
and shall be supported by an affidavit of a person who has knowledge of the facts stating that to the person’s best knowledge and belief the costs are correct, are reasonable and necessary, and have not been satisfied. The notice of motion shall be served on the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(c) The court shall make an order allowing or disallowing the costs to the extent justified under the circumstances of the case.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

685.090.

(a) Costs are added to and become a part of the judgment:

(1) Upon the filing of an order allowing the costs pursuant to this chapter.

(2) If a memorandum of costs is filed pursuant to Section 685.070 and no motion to tax is made, upon the expiration of the time for making the motion.

(3) As specified in Section 685.095.

(b) The costs added to the judgment pursuant to this section are included in the principal amount of the judgment remaining unsatisfied.

(c) If a writ or earnings withholding order is outstanding at the time the costs are added to the judgment pursuant to this section, the levying officer shall add the amount of those costs to the amount to be collected pursuant to the writ or earnings withholding order if the levying officer receives either of the following before the writ or earnings withholding order is returned:

(1) A certified copy of the court order allowing the costs.

(2) A certificate from the clerk of the court that the costs have been added to the judgment where the costs have been added to the judgment after a memorandum of costs has been filed
pursuant to Section 685.070 and no motion to tax has been made within the time allowed for making the motion.

(d) The levying officer shall include the costs described in subdivision (c) in the amount of the sale or collection distributed to the judgment creditor only if the levying officer receives the certified copy of the court order or the clerk’s certificate before the distribution is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 576, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

685.095.

When a writ is served by a levying officer or registered process server, the costs for that service, as determined pursuant to Section 1033.5, shall be added to and become part of the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1080, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

685.100.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law:

(1) As a prerequisite to the performance by the levying officer of a duty under this title, the judgment creditor shall deposit a sum of money with the levying officer sufficient to pay the costs of performing the duty.

(2) As a prerequisite to the taking of property into custody by the levying officer, whether by keeper or otherwise, the judgment creditor shall deposit with the levying officer a sum of money sufficient to pay the costs of taking the property
and keeping it safely for a period not to exceed 15 days. If continuation of the custody of the property is required, the levying officer shall, from time to time, demand orally or in writing that the judgment creditor deposit additional amounts to cover estimated costs for periods not to exceed 30 days each. A written demand may be mailed or delivered to the judgment creditor. The judgment creditor has not less than three business days after receipt of the demand within which to comply with the demand. If the amount demanded is not paid within the time specified in the oral or written demand, the levying officer shall release the property.

(b) The levying officer is not liable for failure to take or hold property unless the judgment creditor has complied with the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

685.110.

Nothing in this chapter affects the law relating to prejudgment interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Enforcement After Death of Judgment Creditor or Judgment Debtor [686.010. - 686.020.]

686.010.

After the death of the judgment creditor, the judgment may be enforced as provided in this title by the judgment creditor’s executor or administrator or successor in interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

686.020.

After the death of the judgment debtor, enforcement of a judgment against property in the judgment debtor’s estate is governed by the Probate Code, and not by this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1416, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Levying Officers [687.010. - 687.050.]

687.010.

(a) The judgment creditor shall give the levying officer instructions in writing. The instructions shall be signed by the judgment creditor’s attorney of record or, if the judgment creditor does not have an attorney of record, by the judgment creditor. The instructions shall contain the information needed or requested by the levying officer to comply with this title, including, but not limited to,
all of the following:

(1) An adequate description of any property to be levied upon.

(2) A statement whether the property is a dwelling.

(3) If the property is a dwelling, whether it is real or personal property.

(4) The name of the judgment debtor. If the judgment debtor is other than a natural person, the type of legal entity shall be stated.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), the levying officer shall act in accordance with the written instructions to the extent the actions are taken in conformance with the provisions of this title.

(c) Except to the extent the levying officer has actual knowledge that the information is
incorrect, the levying officer may rely on any information contained in the written instructions.

(d) The levying officer instructions may be transmitted electronically to the levying officer pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 263) of Title 4 of Part 1.

(e) If the instructions directing the levying officer to perform a levy are accompanied by a writ of execution for money, possession, or sale of personal or real property issued by the court as an electronic record, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 263.1, or a document printed from an electronic record issued by the court, the instructions shall also include all of the following information, as stated in the writ: 

(1) The date of issuance of the writ.

(2) The name of each judgment
creditor and judgment debtor.

(3) The amount of the total judgment for money, a description of the property subject to a judgment for possession or sale, or both the amount and the description.

(4) A statement indicating that the accompanying writ is either of the following:

(A) An original writ, or a copy of the original writ issued by the court as an electronic record, not already in the possession of the levying officer.

(B) A copy of the original writ already in possession of the levying officer.

(f) Except to the extent the levying officer has actual knowledge that the information in the electronic writ has been altered, the levying officer may proceed in the same manner as if in
possession of a paper version of the original writ.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.   (AB 1167)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

687.020.

(a) As used in this section, “instrument” means a check, draft, money order, or other order for the withdrawal of money from a financial institution, the United States, any state, or any public entity within any state.

(b) If an instrument is payable to the judgment debtor on demand and comes into the possession of a levying officer pursuant to this title, the levying officer shall promptly endorse and present the instrument for payment.

(c) The levying officer shall endorse the instrument by writing
on the instrument (1) the name of the judgment debtor, (2) the name and official title of the levying officer, (3) the title of the court where the judgment is entered, and (4) the date of entry of the judgment and where entered in the records of the court. The endorsement is as valid as if the instrument were endorsed by the judgment debtor. No financial institution or public entity on which the instrument is drawn is liable to any person for payment of the instrument to the levying officer rather than to the judgment debtor by reason of the endorsement. No levying officer is liable by reason of endorsing, presenting, and obtaining payment of the instrument.

(d) If it appears from the face of the instrument that it has been tendered to the judgment debtor in satisfaction of a claim or demand and that endorsement of the instrument is considered a release and satisfaction by the judgment debtor of the claim or demand, the levying officer shall
not endorse the instrument unless the judgment debtor has first endorsed it to the levying officer. If the judgment debtor does not endorse the instrument to the levying officer, the levying officer shall hold the instrument for 30 days and is not liable to the judgment debtor or to any other person for delay in presenting it for payment. At the end of the 30-day holding period, the levying officer shall return the instrument to the maker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

687.030.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, where the method of levy upon property requires that the property be taken into custody or where the levying officer is otherwise directed to take property into custody, the levying officer may do so by any of the following methods:

(a) Removing the property to a place of safekeeping.

(b) Installing a keeper.

(c) Otherwise obtaining possession or control of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

687.040.

(a) The levying officer or registered process server is not liable for actions taken in conformance with the provisions of this title, including actions taken in conformance with the provisions of this title in reliance on information contained in the written instructions of the judgment creditor, or in reliance on information provided to the levying officer by a registered process server pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 699.080 or subdivision (e) of Section 706.101 or subdivision (b) of Section 715.040 or other provision, except to the extent the levying officer or registered process server
has actual knowledge that the information is incorrect. Nothing in this subdivision limits any liability the judgment creditor may have if the levying officer or registered process server acts on the basis of incorrect information given in the written instructions.

(b) Unless the levying officer is negligent in the care or handling of the property, the levying officer is not liable to either the judgment debtor or the judgment creditor for loss by fire, theft, injury, or damage of any kind to personal property while (1) in the possession of the levying officer either in a warehouse or other storage place or in the custody of a keeper or (2) in transit to or from a warehouse or other storage place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 155, Sec. 11.   Effective June 30, 1983.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

687.050.

The levying officer has a special lien, dependent upon possession, on personal property levied upon in the amount of the levying officer’s costs for which an advance has not been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Enforcement of State Tax Liability [688.010. - 688.110.]



  ARTICLE 1. Enforcement Pursuant to Warrant or Notice of Levy [688.010. - 688.050.]

688.010.

A proceeding for the purpose of the remedies provided under this article is a limited civil case if (a) the amount of liability sought to be collected does not exceed the maximum amount in controversy for a limited civil case provided in Section 85, and (b) the legality of the liability being enforced is not contested by the person against whom enforcement is sought.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 43, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

688.020.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, if a warrant may properly be issued by the state, or by a department or agency of the state, pursuant to any provision of the Public Resources Code, Revenue and Taxation Code, or Unemployment Insurance Code, and the warrant may be levied with the same effect as a levy pursuant to a writ of execution, the state or the department or agency of the state authorized to issue the warrant may use any of the remedies available to a judgment creditor, including, but not
 limited to, those provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 708.010) of Division 2.

(b) The proper court for the enforcement of those remedies is a court of any of the following counties:

(1) The county where the debtor resides.

(2) The county where the property against which enforcement is sought is located.

(3) If the debtor does not reside in this state, any county of this state.

(4) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 552, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

688.030.

(a) If pursuant to any provision of the Public Resources Code, Revenue and Taxation Code (excluding Sections 3201 to 3204, inclusive), or Unemployment Insurance Code, property is levied upon pursuant to a warrant or notice of levy issued by the state or by a department or agency of the state for the collection of a liability:

(1) If the debtor is a natural person, the debtor is entitled to the same exemptions to which a judgment debtor is
 entitled. Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the claim of exemption shall be made, heard, and determined as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 in the same manner as if the property were levied upon under a writ of execution.

(2) A third person may claim ownership or the right to possession of the property or a security interest in or lien on the property. Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) or as otherwise provided by statute, the third-party claim shall be made, heard, and determined as provided in Division 4 (commencing with Section 720.010) in the same manner as if the property were levied upon under a writ of execution.

(b) In the case of a levy pursuant to a notice of levy:

(1) The claim of exemption or the third-party claim shall be filed with the state
 department or agency that issued the notice of levy.

(2) The state department or agency that issued the notice of levy shall perform the duties of the levying officer, except that the state department or agency need not give itself the notices that the levying officer is required to serve on a judgment creditor or creditor or the notices that a judgment creditor or creditor is required to give to the levying officer. The state department or agency in performing the duties of the levying officer under this paragraph has no obligation to search public records or otherwise seek to determine whether any lien or encumbrance exists on property sold or collected.

(c) A claim of exemption or a third-party claim pursuant to this section shall be heard and determined in the superior court in the county where the property levied upon is located.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 552, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

688.040.

For the purpose of this article, as used in this title:

(a) “Judgment creditor” or “creditor” means the state or the department or agency of the state seeking to collect the liability.

(b) “Judgment debtor” or “debtor” means the debtor from whom the liability is sought to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

688.050.

For the purpose of applying Section 694.080, 703.050, or 703.100, the date of creation of a tax lien is the earliest of the following times:

(a) The time when a notice of state tax lien is recorded or filed pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) The time when the property is levied upon pursuant to a warrant or notice of levy or notice to withhold issued by the state or by a department or agency of the state.

(c) The time when any other act is performed that creates or perfects a lien on specific property as distinguished from a lien on the debtor’s property generally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Enforcement of Judgment for Taxes [688.110. - 688.110.]

688.110.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, if a judgment is entered on a claim for taxes by a public entity, the judgment is enforceable pursuant to this title in the same manner as any other money judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Enforcement of Support Judgments [689.010. - 689.050.]

689.010.

For the purpose of the remedies provided under this chapter, jurisdiction is conferred upon the superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 957, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

689.020.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, whenever a warrant may properly be issued by a local child support agency pursuant to Section 17522 of the Family Code, and the warrant may be levied with the same effect as a levy pursuant to a writ of execution, the local child support agency may use any of the remedies available to a judgment creditor, including, but not limited to, those provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 708.010) of Division 2.

(b) The proper
court for the enforcement of the remedies provided under this chapter is the superior court in the county where the local child support agency enforcing the support obligation is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

689.030.

(a) Whenever the local child support agency, pursuant to Section 17522 of the Family Code, levies upon property pursuant to a warrant or notice of levy for the collection of a support obligation:

(1) If the debtor is a natural person, the debtor is entitled to the same exemptions to which a judgment debtor is entitled. Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the claim of exemption shall be made, heard, and determined as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with
Section 703.010) of Division 2 in the same manner as if the property were levied upon under a writ of execution.

(2) A third person may claim ownership or the right to possession of the property or a security interest in or lien on the property. Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) or as otherwise provided by statute, the third-party claim shall be made, heard, and determined as provided in Division 4 (commencing with Section 720.010) in the same manner as if the property were levied upon under a writ of execution.

(b) In the case of a warrant or notice of levy issued pursuant to Section 17522 of the Family Code, the claim of exemption or the third-party claim shall be filed with the local child support agency that issued the warrant or notice of levy.

(c) A claim of exemption or a third-party claim
pursuant to this section shall be heard and determined in the court specified in Section 689.010 in the county where the local child support agency enforcing the support obligation is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 7.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

689.040.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the case of a writ of execution issued by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 699.010) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010) of Division 2, the local child support agency, when enforcing a support obligation pursuant to Division 17 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Family Code, may perform the duties of the levying officer, except that the local child support agency need not give itself the notices that the levying officer is
required to serve on a judgment creditor or creditor or the notices that a judgment creditor or creditor is required to give to the levying officer.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 700.140, if the writ of execution is for a deposit or credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank or savings and loan association, the local child support agency may deliver or mail the writ of execution to a centralized location designated by the bank or savings and loan association. If the writ of execution is received at the designated central location, it will apply to all deposits and credits and personal property held by the bank or savings and loan association regardless of the location of that property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 8.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

689.050.

For the purpose of this chapter:

(a) “Judgment creditor” or “creditor” means the local child support agency seeking to collect a child or spousal support obligation pursuant to a support order.

(b) “Judgment debtor” or “debtor” means the debtor from whom the support obligation is sought to be collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 9.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Enforcement of Judgments by Labor Commissioner [690.020. - 690.050.]

690.020.

For the purpose of the remedies provided under this chapter, jurisdiction is conferred upon the superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

690.030.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, whenever a warrant or notice of levy may properly be issued by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 96.8 of the Labor Code, and the warrant may be levied with the same effect as a levy pursuant to a writ of execution, the Labor Commissioner may use any of the remedies available to a judgment creditor, including, but not limited to, those provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 708.010) of Division 2.

(b) The proper court for the enforcement of the remedies provided under this chapter is the superior court of any of the following counties:

(1) The county where the employee resides.

(2) The county where the judgment debtor resides.

(3) The county where the person against whom the levy or warrant was issued resides.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

690.040.

(a) Whenever the Labor Commissioner, pursuant to Section 96.8 of the Labor Code, levies upon property pursuant to a warrant or notice of levy for the collection of an unsatisfied judgment or award:

(1) If the debtor is a natural person, the debtor is entitled to the same exemptions to which a judgment debtor is entitled. Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the claim of exemption shall
be made, heard, and determined as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 in the same manner as if the property were levied upon under a writ of execution.

(2) A third person may claim ownership or the right to possession of the property or a security interest in or lien on the property. Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) or as otherwise provided by statute, the third-party claim shall be made, heard, and determined as provided in Division 4 (commencing with Section 720.010) in the same manner as if the property were levied upon under a writ of execution.

(b) In the case of a warrant or notice of levy issued pursuant to Section 96.8 of the Labor Code, the claim of exemption or the third-party claim shall be filed with the Labor Commissioner.

(c) A claim of exemption or a
third-party claim pursuant to this section shall be heard and determined in a superior court specified in subdivision (b) of Section 690.030.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

690.050.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, in the case of a writ of execution issued by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 699.010) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010) of Division 2, the Labor Commissioner, when collecting an unsatisfied judgment or award pursuant to Section 96.8 of the Labor Code, may perform the duties of the levying officer, except that the Labor Commissioner need not give himself or herself
the notices that the levying officer is required to serve on a judgment creditor or the notices that a judgment creditor is required to give to the levying officer.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 700.140 and Sections 700.150, 700.160, and 700.170, if the levy is for a deposit, credits, money, or property in the possession or under the control of a bank or savings and loan association or for an account receivable or other general intangible owed to the judgment debtor by an account debtor, the Labor Commissioner may deliver or mail a notice of levy to a centralized location designated by the bank or savings and loan association or, in the case of an account receivable or other general intangible, to the agent for service of process of the account debtor. If the notice of levy is received at the designated central location for the bank or savings and loan association, the notice of levy will apply to all deposits, credits, money,
and personal property held by the bank or savings and loan association regardless of the location of that property. The notice of levy may be issued directly by the Labor Commissioner, whether or not a court has issued a writ of execution, and shall contain all of the information required to be included in a writ of execution under Section 699.520 and in a notice of levy under Section 699.540.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 20. Transitional Provisions [694.010. - 694.090.]

694.010.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Operative date” means July 1, 1983.

(b) “Prior law” means the applicable law in effect on June 30, 1983.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

694.020.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this title on and after its operative date applies to all proceedings commenced prior thereto unless in the opinion of the court application of a particular provision of this title would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the proceedings or the rights of the parties or other interested persons, in which case the particular provision of this title does not apply and prior law applies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

694.030.

(a) Except for a judgment described in Section 683.310 or 683.320, the period for enforcement of a money judgment or a judgment for possession or sale of property entered prior to the operative date is governed on and after the operative date by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 683.010).

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), even though a judgment to which subdivision (a) applies is not renewable pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 683.010) because the time for filing an application for renewal has expired, the judgment may be renewed under Chapter 3
(commencing with Section 683.010) if the court which entered the judgment determines, on noticed motion filed within two years after the operative date, that authority to enforce the judgment after the 10-year period provided in former Section 681 would have been granted if a motion had been made under former Section 685 and the court, in its discretion, makes an order authorizing the renewal of the judgment. The notice of motion shall be served personally or by mail on the judgment debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

694.040.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), property levied upon or otherwise subjected to process for enforcement of a money judgment or a judgment for possession or sale of property prior to the operative date is subject to prior law relating to sale or delivery of possession.

(b) The duties to be performed in the execution of a writ or order for the enforcement of a money judgment or a judgment for possession or sale of property that is served prior to the operative date are governed by prior law.

(c) The manner of payment at a sale of property pursuant to a writ or order after the operative date is governed by Section 701.590.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

694.050.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), property levied upon, or property to be sold upon which foreclosure or other proceedings for sale have been commenced, prior to the operative date that would have been sold subject to the right of redemption under prior law shall be sold subject to the right of redemption and may be redeemed as provided by prior law.

(b) If the judgment creditor and judgment debtor agree in writing, property described in subdivision (a) may be sold as provided in this title rather than subject to the right of redemption.

(c) Property sold prior to the operative date subject to the right of redemption under prior law may be redeemed as provided by prior law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

694.060.

Notwithstanding Section 708.230, an action may be commenced pursuant to Section 708.210 within one year after the operative date if the action could have been commenced under prior law on the day before the operative date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

694.070.

(a) A third-party claim filed prior to the operative date is governed by prior law.

(b) A demand for a third-party claim served on a secured party prior to the operative date is governed by prior law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

694.080.

The exemptions from enforcement of a money judgment provided by this title do not apply to property levied upon or otherwise subjected to a lien prior to the operative date. Whether such property is exempt is determined by the exemptions provided by law at the time the lien was created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

694.090.

On and after the operative date, a declaration of homestead made under prior law pursuant to Title 5 (commencing with Section 1237) of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code is effective only to the extent provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 704.910) of Chapter 4 of Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 2. ENFORCEMENT OF MONEY JUDGMENTS [695.010. - 709.030.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [695.010. - 695.221.]



  ARTICLE 1. Property Subject to Enforcement of Money Judgment [695.010. - 695.070.]

695.010.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, all property of the judgment debtor is subject to enforcement of a money judgment.

(b) If property of the judgment debtor was attached in the action but was transferred before entry of the money judgment in favor of the judgment creditor, the property is subject to enforcement of the money judgment so long as the attachment lien remains effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

695.020.

(a) Community property is subject to enforcement of a money judgment as provided in the Family Code.

(b) Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, if community property that is subject to enforcement of a money judgment is sought to be applied to the satisfaction of a money judgment:

(1) Any provision of this division that applies to the property of the judgment debtor or to obligations owed to
 the judgment debtor also applies to the community property interest of the spouse of the judgment debtor and to obligations owed to the other spouse that are community property.

(2) Any provision of this division that applies to property in the possession or under the control of the judgment debtor also applies to community property in the possession or under the control of the spouse of the judgment debtor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

695.030.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, property of the judgment debtor that is not assignable or transferable is not subject to enforcement of a money judgment.

(b) The following property is subject to enforcement of a money judgment:

(1) An interest in a trust, to the extent provided by law.

(2) A cause of action for money or property that is the subject of a pending action or special proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 820, Sec. 17.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 820.)
-------------------------------------------

695.035.

(a) A lessee’s interest in real property may be applied to the satisfaction of a money judgment in any of the following circumstances:

(1) If the lessee has the right voluntarily to sublet the property or assign the interest in the lease.

(2) If the lessee has the right voluntarily to sublet the property or assign the interest in the lease subject to standards or conditions and the purchaser at the execution sale or other assignee agrees to comply with the standards or conditions that would have had
 to be complied with had the lessee voluntarily sublet the property or assigned the interest in the lease.

(3) If the lessee has the right voluntarily to sublet the property or assign the interest in the lease with the consent of the lessor, in which case the obligation of the lessor to consent to the assignment is subject to the same standard that would apply had the lessee voluntarily sublet the property or assigned the interest in the lease.

(4) In any other case, if the lessor consents in writing.

(b) A provision in a lease for the termination or modification of the lease upon an involuntary transfer or assignment of the lessee’s interest is ineffective to the extent that such provision would prevent the application of the lessee’s interest to the satisfaction of the money judgment under subdivision
 (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

695.040.
